Maryland, session 2025, HB0373.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
20–215. RESERVED.
20–216. RESERVED.
PART V. REPORTING REQUIREMENTS.
20–217.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0373*

HOUSE BILL 373
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT TO THE CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND
PREVENTION ANY DATA REGARDING ABORTION REQUESTED BY THE CENTERS FOR
DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REFUSE TO SUBMIT DATA REQUESTED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION IF SUBMITTING THE DATA WOULD BE IN
VIOLATION OF FEDERAL OR STATE LAW.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.